Vermont, session 2025-2026, H250.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
* * * Effective July 1, 2026 * * *
Sec. 1. 9 V.S.A. § 2494p is amended to read:
§ 2494p. DEFINITIONS
As used in this subchapter:
* * *
(8) “Station wear” means uniform shirts and pants worn by firefighting
personnel in the performance of their duties, often underneath personal
protective equipment.
Sec. 2. 9 V.S.A. § 2494s is amended to read:
§ 2494s. SALE OF PERSONAL PROTECTIVE EQUIPMENT AND
STATION WEAR CONTAINING PFAS
(a) A manufacturer or other person that sells firefighting equipment to any
person, municipality, or State agency shall provide written notice to the
purchaser at the time of sale, citing to this subchapter, if the personal protective
equipment or station wear contains PFAS. The written notice shall include a
statement that the personal protective equipment or station wear contains
PFAS and the reason PFAS are added to the equipment.
(b) The manufacturer or person selling personal protective equipment or
station wear and the purchaser of the personal protective equipment or station
VT LEG #380556 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.250
2025 Page 3 of 4
wear shall retain the notice for at least three years from the date of the
transaction.
* * * Effective July 1, 2028 * * *
Sec. 3. 9 V.S.A. § 2494s is amended to read:
§ 2494s. PROHIBITED SALE OF PERSONAL PROTECTIVE
EQUIPMENT AND STATION WEAR CONTAINING PFAS
(a) A manufacturer or other person that sells firefighting equipment to any
person, municipality, or State agency shall provide written notice to the
purchaser at the time of sale, citing to this subchapter, if the personal protective
equipment or station wear contains PFAS. The written notice shall include a
statement that the personal protective equipment or station wear contains
PFAS and the reason PFAS are added to the equipment not sell, offer for sale,
distribute for sale, or distribute for use in this State any personal protective
equipment or station wear to which PFAS have been intentionally added.
(b) The manufacturer or person selling personal protective equipment or
station wear and the purchaser of the personal protective equipment shall retain
the notice for at least three years from the date of the transaction. [Repealed.]
* * * Effective Dates * * *
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATES
(a) This section and Secs. 1 (definitions) and 2 (sale of personal protective
equipment and station wear containing PFAS) shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #380556 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.250
2025 Page 4 of 4
(b) Sec. 3 (prohibited sale of personal protective equipment and station
wear containing PFAS) shall take effect on July 1, 2028.
VT LEG #380556 v.1